Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.32.640 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 221 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The commission may adopt such rules as it deems necessary to carry out this chapter.(2) The commission may adopt rules governing administration of sedation and general anesthesia by persons licensed under this chapter, including necessary training, education, equipment, and the issuance of any permits, certificates, or registration as required.(3) A dental procedure that requires a patient to be placed under deep sedation or analgesia must be performed by a multiprovider system.(4) For the purpose of this section:(a) "Multiprovider system" means a system where the dentist performing the dental procedure and the person who is sedating and monitoring the patient are two distinct individuals with separate tasks. The person administering the deep sedation must be a licensed health care provider acting within the scope of their practice.(b) "Deep sedation" or "analgesia" means a drug-induced depression of consciousness during which patients cannot be easily aroused but respond purposefully following repeated or painful stimulation. The ability to independently maintain ventilatory function may be impaired. Patients may require assistance in maintaining a patent airway, and spontaneous ventilation may be inadequate. Cardiovascular function is usually maintained.--- END ---